Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Historic Resources.

§ 10.1-2200.
Definitions.

As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Battlefield property”
means any real property in the Commonwealth that is listed in the Report on the Nation’s Civil War Battlefields by the Civil War Sites Advisory Commission (Civil War Sites Advisory Commission/National Park Service, 1993, as amended); the Report to Congress on the Historic Preservation of Revolutionary War and War of 1812 Sites in the United States by the American Battlefield Protection Program of the National Park Service (U.S. Department of the Interior/National Park Service, 2007, as amended or superseded); or the Update to the Civil War Sites Advisory Commission Report on the Nation’s Civil War Battlefields, Commonwealth of Virginia, by the American Battlefield Protection Program (U.S. Department of the Interior/National Park Service, 2009, as amended or superseded).

“Board”
means the Board of Historic Resources.

“Department”
means the Department of Historic Resources.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Historic Resources.

History.

1989, c. 656; 2015, c. 100.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 100 added the definition for “Battlefield property.”

§ 10.1-2201.
Department created; appointment of Director; Director to serve as State Historic Preservation Officer.

There is hereby created a Department of Historic Resources. The Department shall be headed by a Director.

The Director shall be appointed by the Governor to serve at his pleasure for a term coincident with his own.
The Director shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if it is in session when the appointment is made, and if not then in session, at the next succeeding session.

The Director shall also serve as the State Historic Preservation Officer for the purposes of carrying out the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (P.L. 89-665), as amended.

History.

1989, c. 656.

Editor’s note.

For the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, P.L. 89-665, see now 54 USCS § 100101 et seq.

§ 10.1-2202.
Powers and duties of the Director.

In addition to the powers and duties conferred upon the Director elsewhere and in order to encourage, stimulate, and support the identification, evaluation, protection, preservation, and rehabilitation of the Commonwealth’s significant historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources; in order to establish and maintain a permanent record of those resources; and in order to foster a greater appreciation of these resources among the citizens of the Commonwealth, the Director shall have the following powers and duties which may be delegated by the Director:

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out those duties conferred by law;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of his duties and the execution of his powers, including but not limited to contracts with private nonprofit organizations, the United States, other state agencies and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To apply for and accept bequests, grants and gifts of real and personal property as well as endowments, funds, and grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and any other source. The Director shall have the authority to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable;

To perform acts necessary or convenient to carry out the duties conferred by law;

To promulgate regulations, in accordance with the Virginia Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) and not inconsistent with the National Historic Preservation Act (P.L. 89-665) and its attendant regulations, as are necessary to carry out all responsibilities incumbent upon the State Historic Preservation Officer, including at a minimum criteria and procedures for submitting nominations of properties to the National Park Service for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or for designation as National Historic Landmarks;

To conduct a broad survey and to maintain an inventory of buildings, structures, districts, objects, and sites of historic, architectural, archaeological, or cultural interest which constitute the tangible remains of the Commonwealth’s cultural, political, economic, military, or social history;

To publish lists of properties, including buildings, structures, districts, objects, and sites, designated as landmarks by the Board, to inspect designated properties from time to time, and periodically publish a complete register of designated properties setting forth appropriate information concerning those properties;

With the consent of the landowners, to provide appropriately designed markers for designated buildings, structures, districts, objects and sites;

To acquire battlefield properties, designated landmarks, and other properties of historic significance as determined by the Department, or easements or interests therein, and to administer such properties, whether acquired pursuant to this subsection or subdivision A 4 of §

10.1-2204

;

To aid and to encourage counties, cities and towns to establish historic zoning districts for designated landmarks and to adopt regulations for the preservation of historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural values;

To provide technical advice and assistance to individuals, groups and governments conducting historic preservation programs and regularly to seek advice from the same on the effectiveness of Department programs;

To prepare and place, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, highway historical markers approved by the Board of Historic Resources on or along the highway or street closest to the location which is intended to be identified by the marker;

To develop a procedure for the certification of historic districts and structures within the historic districts for federal income tax purposes;

To aid and to encourage counties, cities, and towns in the establishment of educational programs and materials for school use on the importance of Virginia’s historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources;

To conduct a program of archaeological research with the assistance of the State Archaeologist which includes excavation of significant sites, acquisition and maintenance of artifact collections for the purposes of study and display, and dissemination of data and information derived from the study of sites and collections;

To manage and administer the Historic Resources Fund as provided in §

10.1-2202.1

; and

To manage and administer the Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund as provided in §

10.1-2211.3

.

History.

1989, c. 656; 1992, cc. 256, 801; 1995, c. 21; 2005, c. 85; 2006, c. 32; 2015, c. 100; 2020, cc. 455, 456; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 406.

Editor’s note.

For the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, P.L. 89-665, see now 54 USCS § 100101 et seq.

Acts 2005, c. 85, which added subdivision 17, in cl. 2 provides: “That should no funds from any source be received in the fund by July 1, 2007, the provisions of this act shall expire.” As of May 15, 2008, no funding has been provided; thus, the subsection has expired.

Acts 2006, c. 32, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 1992 amendments.

The 1992 amendment by c. 256 added present subdivision 3, and redesignated former subdivisions 3 through 13 as subdivisions 4 through 14.

The 1992 amendment by c. 801 added present subdivision 5, and redesignated former subdivisions 5 through 14 as subdivisions 6 through 15.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 85 added subdivision 17 and made related changes. For contingent expiration, see Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 32 inserted “including buildings, structures, districts, objects, and sites” following “list of properties” in subdivision 7; deleted “and sites” following “landmarks” in subdivision 9; and inserted “or cultural” and made a related change in subdivision 10.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 100 inserted “battlefield properties” in subdivision 9.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 455 and 456 are identical, and substituted “To manage and administer the Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund as provided in §

10.1-2211.3

” for “ Expired. ” in subdivision 17.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 406, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision 9, which read: “To acquire and to administer battlefield properties and designated landmarks, or easements or interests therein.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Matter delegated to Department of Historic Resources. —

The Attorney General declined to render an opinion regarding whether a building located in a historic district and fitting the definition of a “ruin” may be removed, as the Department of Historic Resources was the appropriate agency to make such a determination. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Johnny S. Joannou, Member, House of Delegates, 01-052, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 63 (6/29/01).

§ 10.1-2202.1.
Historic Resources Fund established; administration; purpose.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Historic Resources Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. The Fund shall be administered and managed by the Director and used for the general purposes of education, financing of museum operating and capital expenses, performing research, and conducting special historic preservation projects as identified by the Department and the donors. The Fund shall consist of appropriations from the General Assembly designated for the Fund, any gifts and bequests, cash and noncash, and all proceeds from the sale of Department publications and educational or promotional material, income from contracted services, and grants. Initial funding shall be made by a transfer of existing donations and special funds consistent with the intent of this new fund.

The Fund shall be established on the books of the State Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any income earned from gifts, bequests, securities, and other property shall be deposited to the credit of the Fund.

History.

1995, c. 21.

Cross references.

As to entities entitled to voluntary contributions of tax refunds, see §

58.1-344.3

.

§ 10.1-2202.2.
Preservation Easement Fund established; uses.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Preservation Easement Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of general funds appropriated by the General Assembly and funds received as gifts, endowments, or grants from the United States Government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and funds from any other available sources, public or private. All such funds shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of: (i) supporting and promoting a broad-based easement program and (ii) providing grants in accordance with this section to persons who convey a perpetual easement to the Board pursuant to the Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.) and, if applicable, the Virginia Conservation Easement Act (§

10.1-1009

et seq.) for the purposes of preserving real property which is important for its historical, architectural or archaeological aspects. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

The Director shall establish, administer, manage, and make expenditures and allocations from the Fund.

Grants from the Fund may be made to persons conveying a perpetual easement to the Board to pay some or all of the costs associated with such conveyance, which may include the cost of registering the property with the Virginia Landmarks Register and the National Register of Historic Places, and legal, survey, appraisal and other costs.

The Director shall establish guidelines for the submittal and evaluation of grant applications and for the award of grants from the Fund. The guidelines shall authorize the Director to give priority to applications that demonstrate the applicant’s financial need for a grant.

History.

1998, c. 479.

§ 10.1-2202.3.
Stewardship of state-owned historic properties.

In order to consider the broad public interest and protect the financial investment in state-owned historic assets, the Department shall develop, on a biennial basis, a report on the stewardship of state-owned properties. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a priority list of the Commonwealth’s most significant state-owned properties that are eligible for but not designated on the Virginia Landmarks Register pursuant to §

10.1-2206.1

. The report shall also provide a priority list of significant state-owned properties, designated on or eligible for the Virginia Landmarks Register, which are threatened with the loss of historic integrity or functionality. In developing the report, the Department shall, in addition to significance and threat, take into account other public interest considerations associated with landmark designation and the provision of proper care and maintenance of property. These considerations shall include: (i) potential financial consequences to the Commonwealth associated with failure to care for and maintain property, (ii) significant public educational potential, (iii) significant tourism opportunities, and (iv) community values and comments. The report shall be forwarded to all affected state agencies, including institutions of higher education, the Governor, the Secretary of Administration, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, the Secretary of Finance, and the General Assembly. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall assist and support the development of the report by providing information and access to property as may be requested.

Each agency that owns property included in the report required by subsection A shall initiate consultation with the Department within 60 days of receipt of the report and make a good faith effort to reach a consensus decision on designation of an unlisted property and on the feasibility, advisability, and general manner of addressing property needs in the case of a threatened historic property.

The Department shall prepare a biennial status report summarizing actions, decisions taken, and the condition of properties previously identified as priorities. The status report, which may be combined with the report required pursuant to subsection A, shall be forwarded to all affected state agencies, including institutions of higher education, as well as to the Governor, the Secretary of Administration, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, the Secretary of Finance, and the General Assembly.

The reports required in subsections A and C shall be completed and distributed as required no later than May 1 of each odd-numbered year, so that information contained therein is available to the agencies, the Secretary of Finance, the Secretary of Administration, and the Governor, as well as the General Assembly, during budget preparation.

History.

2006, c. 747; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “higher education” was substituted for “higher learning” twice to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, in subsections A and C, inserted “and Historic.”

§ 10.1-2202.4.
Virginia Battlefield Preservation Fund established; eligibility; uses.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Battlefield Preservation Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of general funds appropriated by the General Assembly and funds received as gifts, endowments, or grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and funds from any other available sources, public or private, including gifts and bequeaths. All such funds shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the Department solely for the purpose of making grants to private nonprofit organizations, hereafter referred to as “organizations,” to match federal and other matching funds. All such grants shall be made solely for the fee simple purchase of, or purchase of protective interests in, any Virginia battlefield property listed in the following reports: the Report on the Nation’s Civil War Battlefields by the Civil War Sites Advisory Commission (Civil War Sites Advisory Commission/National Park Service, 1993, as amended) or the Report to Congress on the Historic Preservation of Revolutionary War and War of 1812 Sites in the United States by the American Battlefield Protection Program of the National Park Service (U.S. Department of the Interior/National Park Service, 2007, as amended or superseded). Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

The Director shall establish, administer, manage, and make expenditures and allocations from the Fund.

Organizations seeking grant funding from the Fund shall be required to provide at least $1 in matching funds for each $1 received from the Fund for the proposed project. As used herein, the term “matching funds” shall include both cash and the value of any contribution due to a bargain sale or the donation of land or interest therein made by the landowner as part of the proposed project. No state funds may be included in determining the amount of the match.

Eligible costs for which moneys from the Fund may be allocated include acquisition of land and any improvements thereon (collectively referred to herein as “land”) or permanent protective interests, such as perpetual conservation easements, and costs associated with such acquisitions, including the cost of appraisals, environmental reports, any survey, title searches and title insurance, and other closing costs.

Grants from the Fund shall not exceed 50 percent of the appraised value of the land or permanent protective interest therein.

Grants from the Fund may be awarded for prospective purchases or for acquisitions on which the applicant has closed. In the latter case the applicant shall demonstrate:

The closing occurred no more than 12 months prior to the date of application for the grant; and

An identifiable threat to the resource or compelling need for preservation existed at the time of the purchase.

Any eligible organization making an acquisition of land or interest therein pursuant to this section shall grant to the Board or other holder a perpetual easement placing restrictions on the use or development of the land. In cases where the easement is granted to a holder other than the Board, all terms and conditions of the easement shall be reviewed by and found by the Department to accomplish the perpetual preservation of the battlefield property. Such other holder shall demonstrate to the Department that it has the capacity and expertise to manage and enforce the terms of the easement.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the subsequent transfer or assignment by a state agency or other owner or holder of any property interest acquired pursuant to this section to the United States of America to be incorporated into a national park, national forest, national wildlife refuge, or other national conservation area in accordance with 54 U.S.C. § 100101, 16 U.S.C. § 551, the Fish and Wildlife Act of 1956 (16 U.S.C. § 742a et seq.), or 16 U.S.C. § 1131, as amended and applicable. The Department, acting on behalf of the Board, shall facilitate transfers and assignments of any such interests held by the Board. The United States of America shall be considered a “public body” as that term is defined in the Virginia Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.) for the purposes of any transfer or assignment to the United States of America of any easement granted under this section.

The Director shall establish, administer, manage, and make expenditures and allocations from the Fund and shall establish guidelines for applications, evaluation, and award of grants from the Fund in consultation with appropriate battlefield preservation interests. In making grants, the Department shall give primary consideration to the significance of the battlefield and the degree to which the property falls within the core and study areas of the specific battlefield, as described in the relevant report of the American Battlefield Protection Program, as well as proximity to other protected lands; threat to and integrity of the features associated with the battle in question; and the financial and administrative capacity of the applicant to complete the project and to maintain and manage the property in a manner that is consistent with the public investment and public interests, such as education, recreation, research, heritage tourism promotion, or orderly community development.

History.

2010, cc. 237, 479; 2015, c. 467.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “54 U.S.C. § 100101, 16 U.S.C. § 551, the Fish and Wildlife Act of 1956 (16 U.S.C. § 742a et seq.), or 16 U.S.C. § 1131, as amended and applicable” was substituted for “16 U.S.C. §§ 1, 551, 742(a), or 1131, as amended and applicable” in subsection H.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 467 in subsection A, substituted “Virginia Battlefield” for “Civil War Site” in the first sentence, and rewrote the second sentence in the second paragraph, which read “All such grants shall be made solely for the fee simple purchase of, or purchase of protective interests in, any Virginia Civil War historic site listed in the ”Report on the Nation’s Civil War Battlefields,“ issued in 1993 or as amended or reissued pursuant to the Civil War Battlefield Protection Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-359) as amended or supplemented by new information by the National Park Service’s American Battlefield Protection Program”; in subsection D, substituted “Board” for “Department” twice, deleted “(i) be consistent with the intent and purpose of the Virginia Conservation Easement Act (§

10.1-1009

et seq.) and (ii)” preceding “accomplish” and substituted “battlefield property” for “Civil War historic site”; rewrote former subsection H, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the subsequent transfer of property acquired pursuant to this section to the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, subject to conservation provisions consistent with this section”; and in subsection I, substituted “evaluation” for “prioritization” and deleted Civil War“ preceding ”battlefield“ in the first sentence and substituted ”In making grants, the Department shall give primary consideration to the significance of the battlefield and the degree to which the property falls within the core and study areas of the specific battlefield, as described in the relevant report of the American Battlefield Protection Program,“ for ”Consideration shall be given, but not limited to, the following: significance of the battlefield and the location of the proposed project in relation to core and study areas.”

§ 10.1-2202.5.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Virginia Black, Indigenous, and People of Color Historic Preservation Fund; established.

As used in this section:

“Eligible costs” means acquisition of real property and any improvements thereon; acquisition of a permanent protective interest in real property such as a perpetual preservation easement; costs associated with the acquisition of real property or interests thereof, such as appraisals, environmental reports, surveys, title searches, title insurance, and closing costs; costs of registering property with the Virginia Landmarks Register and the National Register of Historic Places, including survey and consultation fees and other related costs; and costs associated with the material rehabilitation or stabilization of real property.

“Fund” means the Virginia Black, Indigenous, and People of Color Historic Preservation Fund.

“Organization” means a private nonprofit organization.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Black, Indigenous, and People of Color Historic Preservation Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose, any funds from the federal government, and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this section. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for grants to any eligible state-recognized or federally recognized Indian tribe, private nonprofit organization, or locality for eligible costs related to the purchase of a fee simple or protective interest in real property; rehabilitation or stabilization of real property; or data recovery of any cultural or historical property associated with Black, indigenous, or people of color communities and listed in the Virginia Landmarks Register, the National Register of Historic Places, designated as a National Historic Landmark, or determined eligible for such listing. Matching funds may be required for grants from the Fund.

Grants awarded from the Fund for the acquisition of real property by fee simple purchase or by purchase of protective interests shall not exceed 50 percent of the appraised value of the land or permanent protective interest.

Grants from the Fund may be awarded for a prospective purchase or for acquisitions upon which the applicant has already completed the transaction. If the transaction has been completed at the time of the application for the grant, the applicant shall demonstrate that (i) the transaction was completed no more than 12 months prior to the date of the application for the grant and (ii) an identifiable threat to the resource or compelling need for preservation existed at the time of the purchase.

Any state-recognized or federally recognized Indian tribe, organization, or locality receiving a grant from the Fund shall grant the Board or other holder a perpetual easement pursuant to the Open-Space Land Act (§

10.1-1700

et seq.) for the purpose of preserving real property that is important for its historical, architectural, or archaeological aspects, replacing restrictions on the use or development of the land. If the easement is granted to a holder other than the Board, all terms and conditions of the easement shall be reviewed by the Department to ensure that the easement accomplishes the perpetual preservation of the property. Such other holder shall demonstrate to the Department that it has the capacity and expertise to manage and enforce the terms of the easement.

The Director shall administer and manage the Fund and shall establish guidelines for applications, evaluations, and recommendations to the Board for the award of grants from the Fund. In awarding grants, the Board shall give primary consideration to the significance of the real property and the threat to and integrity of features associated with such property. The Board shall also consider the applicant’s financial need, the ability of an applicant to provide matching funds, and the financial and administrative capacity of the applicant to complete the project and maintain and manage the property in a manner that is consistent with public investment and public interest, such as education, recreation, research, heritage tourism promotion, or orderly community development. The Director shall make grant award recommendations to the Board for approval by the Board. The Director shall incorporate the ConserveVirginia program, established pursuant to §

10.1-104.6:1

, into grant award recommendations to the Board, when appropriate.

History.

2022, cc. 185, 186.

§ 10.1-2203.
Board of Historic Resources membership; appointment; terms.

The Virginia Historic Landmarks Board within the executive branch of state government is continued as the Board of Historic Resources and shall consist of seven members. The members of the Board shall initially be appointed for terms of office as follows: two for a one-year term, two for a two-year term, two for a three-year term, and one for a four-year term. Appointments thereafter shall be made for four-year terms, except appointments to fill vacancies occurring other than by expiration of term, which shall be filled for the unexpired term.

In making appointments to the Board, the Governor shall consult with agencies and organizations in Virginia that have as their principal interest the study of Virginia’s history and the preservation of Virginia’s historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources. The Governor shall also consult appropriate agencies and organizations that represent business and property interests that may be affected by actions of the Board.

History.

1966, c. 632, § 10-136; 1968, c. 612; 1976, c. 484; 1984, c. 750; 1986, c. 608; 1988, c. 891, §

10.1-800

; 1989, c. 656; 1992, c. 801.

§ 10.1-2204.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Duties of Board of Historic Resources.

The Board of Historic Resources shall:

Designate historic landmarks, including buildings, structures, districts, objects and sites which constitute the principal historical, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources which are of local, statewide or national significance and withdraw designation either upon a determination by the Board that the property has failed to retain those characteristics for which it was designated or upon presentation of new or additional information proving to the satisfaction of the Board that the designation had been based on error of fact;

Establish and endorse appropriate historic preservation practices for the care and management of designated landmarks;

Approve the proposed text and authorize the manufacture of highway historical markers;

Acquire battlefield properties, designated landmarks, and other properties of historic significance, or easements or interests therein;

Review the programs and services of the Department of Historic Resources, including annual plans and make recommendations to the Director and the Governor concerning the effectiveness of those programs and services;

In cooperation with the Department, and through public lectures, writings, and other educational activities, promote awareness of the importance of historic resources and the benefits of their preservation and use; and

Apply for gifts, grants and bequests for deposit in the Historic Resources Fund to promote the missions of the Board and the Department.

For the purposes of this chapter, designation by the Board of Historic Resources shall mean an act of official recognition designed (i) to educate the public to the significance of the designated resource and (ii) to encourage local governments and property owners to take the designated property’s historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural significance into account in their planning, the local government comprehensive plan, and their decision making. Such designation, itself, shall not regulate the action of local governments or property owners with regard to the designated property.

History.

1966, c. 632, § 10-138; 1984, c. 750, § 10-259; 1986, c. 608; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-801; 1989, c. 656; 1992, c. 801; 1995, c. 21; 2006, c. 32; 2015, c. 100; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 406.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 801, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Historic Resources shall conduct an evaluation of the Board of Historic Resources’ designation of any historic district designated after January 1, 1989, which has not been listed in the National Register of Historic Places. In conducting its evaluation, the Department of Historic Resources shall consult with the boards of supervisors of the counties or their representatives, and with the owners of the property located within the designated historic districts. The evaluation shall include:

“1. An examination of the documentary information that led to the designation and of any new or additional documentary information presented to the Department, in order to determine whether either or both of the designations or the boundaries of the historic districts were based on any error of fact and whether these findings provide grounds for recommending that the designations be amended or withdrawn;

“2. An examination of (i) all land uses permitted by existing zoning within designated areas, (ii) possible land uses pursuant to any zoning changes currently contemplated by the counties or indicated by their current master plans, and (iii) all development proposals made known to the Department of Historic Resources by the counties or by the property owners;

“3. An identification of those development proposals that may be necessity or choice be dependent upon federal funding or licensure, and thus subject to the consultation process required by Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act and, to the extent practicable, an identification of probable outcomes of that consultation process and of possible strategies for successful resolution of any disagreements;

“4. Any analysis of the Virginia Department of Transportation’s continuing ability to meet existing transportation needs, as well as those needs created by anticipated development, in the historic districts;

“5. An identification of any smaller areas within the designated historic districts that the Department of Historic Resources believes should be high priority areas for preservation and an identification of strategies for accomplishing that preservation in a manner that is fair to current property owners; and

“6. An analysis of whether either or both of the designations by the Board of Historic Resources of the battlefields as historic districts, or the determinations of eligibility for the National Register of Historic Places made by the National Park Service pursuant to the National Historic Preservation Act, should be amended or withdrawn as the development identified in item 2 is carried out.”

Acts 2006, c. 32, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

The 1992 amendment

designated the former section as subsection A, substituted the language beginning “either upon a determination by the Board” for “for failure to retain the characteristics which led to designation” in subdivision A 1, and added subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 32, in subdivision A 1, inserted “including” and substituted “archaeological, and cultural resources” for “and archaeological sites”; and deleted “and sites” following “designated landmarks” in subdivision A 4.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 100 inserted “battlefield properties and”
in subdivision 4.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 406, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision 4, which read, “Acquire by purchase or gift battlefield properties and designated landmarks, or easements or interests therein.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 185 and 186 are identical, and added subdivision A 7; redesignated accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-2204.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Duties of Board of Historic Resources.

The Board of Historic Resources shall:

Designate historic landmarks, including buildings, structures, districts, objects and sites which constitute the principal historical, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources which are of local, statewide or national significance and withdraw designation either upon a determination by the Board that the property has failed to retain those characteristics for which it was designated or upon presentation of new or additional information proving to the satisfaction of the Board that the designation had been based on error of fact;

Establish and endorse appropriate historic preservation practices for the care and management of designated landmarks;

Approve the proposed text and authorize the manufacture of highway historical markers;

Acquire battlefield properties, designated landmarks, and other properties of historic significance, or easements or interests therein;

Review the programs and services of the Department of Historic Resources, including annual plans and make recommendations to the Director and the Governor concerning the effectiveness of those programs and services;

In cooperation with the Department, and through public lectures, writings, and other educational activities, promote awareness of the importance of historic resources and the benefits of their preservation and use;

Approve awards from the Virginia Black, Indigenous, and People of Color Historic Preservation Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-2202.5

; and

Apply for gifts, grants and bequests for deposit in the Historic Resources Fund to promote the missions of the Board and the Department.

For the purposes of this chapter, designation by the Board of Historic Resources shall mean an act of official recognition designed (i) to educate the public to the significance of the designated resource and (ii) to encourage local governments and property owners to take the designated property’s historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural significance into account in their planning, the local government comprehensive plan, and their decision making. Such designation, itself, shall not regulate the action of local governments or property owners with regard to the designated property.

History.

1966, c. 632, § 10-138; 1984, c. 750, § 10-259; 1986, c. 608; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-801; 1989, c. 656; 1992, c. 801; 1995, c. 21; 2006, c. 32; 2015, c. 100; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 406; 2022, cc. 185, 186.